Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3107
Relocation Incentive Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3107 to 77-3112 shall be known and may be cited as the Relocation Incentive Act.

Laws 2024, LB1023, § 1.